Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB829.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Sections 503 and 1301 of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, are amended to read:Section 503. Kindergartens.--(a) The board of school directors in [any] each school district [may] shall establish and maintain kindergartens for children between the ages of [four] three and [six] five years. When established, the kindergartens shall be an integral part of the elementary school system of the district, and be kept open on a full-time basis 123456789101112131415161718192021 for [not less than two and one-half hours each day for] the full school term as provided in section 1501.(b) The number of full-day kindergartens in any one district shall be fixed by the board of school directors, and shall be open during the school year and made available to all children residing in the district who are of the age fixed pursuant to subsection (a).[If the average attendance in any one kindergarten in any district is ten or less for the school year, the school directors shall, at the close of the school year, discontinue the same.](c) The board of school directors shall appoint and assign a sufficient number of teachers to such kindergartens, who shall be certified in accordance with the rules and regulations prescribed by the [Council of Basic Education] State Board of Education.Section 1301. Age Limits; Temporary Residence.--(a) Every child, being a resident of any school district, between the ages of six (6) and twenty-one (21) years, may attend the public schools in his district, subject to the provisions of this act. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, a child who attains the age of twenty-one (21) years during the school term and who has not graduated from high school may continue to attend the public schools in his district free of charge until the end of the school term. The board of school directors of any school district may admit to the schools of the district, with or without the payment of tuition, any non-resident child temporarily residing in the district, and may require the attendance of such non-resident child in the same manner and on the same conditions as it requires the attendance 20250HB0829PN0860 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 of a resident child.(b) Notwithstanding subsection (a) or any other provision of law or regulation to the contrary, a child, being a resident of a school district, between the ages of three and five years may attend full-day kindergarten in accordance with the provisions of this subarticle and the rules, regulations or standards prescribed by the State Board of Education without the payment of tuition, provided:(1) the school district of the non-resident child is in the same intermediate unit; and(2) the school districts have entered an agreement to offer full-day kindergarten jointly in accordance with regulations of the State Board of Education.Section 2. The definition of "compulsory school age" in section 1326 of the act is amended to read:Section 1326. Definitions.--When used in this article, the following words and phrases shall have the following meanings:* * *"Compulsory school age" shall mean the period of a child's life from the time the child's parents elect to have the child enter school and which shall be no later than six (6) years of age until the child reaches eighteen (18) years of age. Nothing in this section shall be construed to preclude a child's parents from electing to have the child attend full-day kindergarten at three (3) years of age. The term does not include a child who holds a certificate of graduation from a regularly accredited, licensed, registered or approved high school.* * *Section 3. Section 1361 of the act is amended to read:Section 1361. When Provided.--(1) The board of school 20250HB0829PN0860 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 directors in any school district may, out of the funds of the district, provide for the free transportation of any resident pupil to and from the kindergarten, including full-day kindergarten, elementary school, or secondary school in which he is lawfully enrolled, provided that such school is not operated for profit and is located within the district boundaries or outside the district boundaries at a distance not exceeding ten miles by the nearest public highway, except that such ten-mile limit shall not apply to area career and technical schools which regularly serve eligible district pupils or to special schools and classes approved by the Department of Education, and to and from any points within or without the Commonwealth in order to provide field trips for any purpose connected with the educational pursuits of the pupils. When provision is made by a board of school directors for the transportation of public school pupils to and from such schools or to and from any points within or without the Commonwealth in order to provide field trips as herein provided, the board of school directors shall also make identical provision for the free transportation of pupils who regularly attend nonpublic kindergarten, elementary and high schools not operated for profit to and from such schools or to and from any points within or without the Commonwealth in order to provide field trips as herein provided. Such transportation of pupils attending nonpublic schools shall be provided during regular school hours on such dates and periods that the nonpublic school not operated for profit is in regular session, according to the school calendar officially adopted by the directors of the same in accordance with provisions of law. The board of school directors shall provide such transportation whenever so required by any of the 20250HB0829PN0860 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 provisions of this act or of any other act of Assembly.(1.1) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit a board of school directors from entering into an agreement with another school district in the same intermediate unit to provide for the free transportation of resident and nonresident pupils enrolled in full-day kindergarten jointly in accordance with regulations of the State Board of Education.(2) The board of school directors in any school district may, if the board deems it to the best interest of the school district, for the purposes of transporting pupils as required or authorized by any of the provisions of this act or of any other act of the Assembly, appropriate funds for urban common carrier mass transportation purposes from current revenues to urban common carrier mass transportation authorities to assist the authorities to meet costs of operation, maintenance, capital improvements, and debt service. Said contributions shall not be subject to reimbursement by the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania.(3) The State Board of Education shall adopt regulations, including qualifications of school bus drivers, to govern the transportation of school pupils[.] and transportation of pupils enrolled in full-day kindergarten by and between school districts in the same intermediate unit.Section 4. Article XV-D of the act is amended by adding a subarticle to read:(c) Full-Day KindergartenSection 1520-D. Findings and purpose.The General Assembly finds and declares that:(1) Numerous national and international studies have found that high-quality early childhood education gives children the best possible start in life.20250HB0829PN0860 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) The studies conclude that early childhood education, inherent in full-day kindergarten, is essential to supporting the cognitive, social, emotional and physical development of young children.(3) Kindergarten is essential to ensuring the school readiness of children when they enter first grade.(4) Full-day kindergarten should be established and implemented as a formal, integral component of basic education instruction in the public school system of this Commonwealth.(5) The purpose of this subarticle is to provide for the development of a State plan to facilitate the establishment and implementation of full-day kindergarten in this Commonwealth.Section 1521-D. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this subarticle shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Approved provider." A full-day kindergarten provider that is:(1) a school entity;(2) a Head Start program as defined under section 1501-D; or(3) a private provider approved by the department."Charter school." As defined under section 1703-A."Committee." The Full-Day Kindergarten Implementation Advisory Committee established under section 1523-D."Department." The Department of Education of the Commonwealth."Eligible student." A child between three and five years of 20250HB0829PN0860 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 age who is a resident of a school district."Full-day kindergarten." A program of instruction for children between three and five years of age that conforms to the regulations, rules and standards adopted by the department in accordance with the requirements of this subarticle."Intermediate unit." The regional arrangements of school districts to serve given geographic areas in accordance with section 902-A."Program." A full-day kindergarten."School district." Includes school districts of all classes."School entity." Any public school district, intermediate unit, area career and technical school or charter school."Secretary." The Secretary of Education of the Commonwealth."State plan" or "plan." The plan developed by the department for the establishment and implementation of full-day kindergarten by school districts in this Commonwealth.Section 1522-D. Authority, powers and duty of department.(a) Authorization to develop plan.--(1) The department, in collaboration with the committee, shall develop a State plan for the establishment and implementation of full-day kindergarten for eligible students in each school district in this Commonwealth. The plan developed by the department shall be based on the recommendations of the committee established under section 1523-D(a).(2) A school district may satisfy the requirements of this subarticle by offering full-day kindergarten jointly with another school district in the same intermediate unit or with an approved provider in accordance with regulations adopted and promulgated by the State Board of Education.20250HB0829PN0860 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (3) The plan developed by the department in accordance with paragraph (1) shall make full-day kindergarten available to eligible students in this Commonwealth by the 2026-2027 school year.(b) Duties of department.--The department shall have the following powers and duties:(1) To develop a State plan in collaboration with the committee for the establishment and implementation of full-day kindergarten in accordance with subsection (a).(2) To adopt and promulgate rules and regulations necessary to carry out the provisions of this subarticle. Regulations promulgated by the department shall be subject to the act of July 31, 1968 (P.L.769, No.240), referred to as the Commonwealth Documents Law, and the act of June 25, 1982 (P.L.633, No.181), known as the Regulatory Review Act. The regulations shall include, but not be limited to, the following:(i) Standards for full-day kindergarten.(ii) The minimum number of instructional hours required for full-day kindergarten.(iii) Standards and procedures to govern the operation of full-day kindergarten by a school district jointly with another school district or school districts in the same intermediate unit.(iv) Standards and procedures that a school district must follow to contract with approved providers of full-day kindergarten.Section 1523-D. Full-Day Kindergarten Implementation Advisory Committee.(a) Establishment.--The Full-Day Kindergarten Implementation 20250HB0829PN0860 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Advisory Committee is established for the purpose of assisting and advising the department in the development and implementation of a State plan for full-day kindergarten in school districts in this Commonwealth by the 2026-2027 school year in accordance with section 1524-D(a). The committee shall be staffed by employees of the department as designated by the secretary.(b) Membership of advisory committee.--(1) Except as provided in subsection (c), the secretary shall determine the public membership, terms of service and organization of the committee and shall appoint the public members of the committee in accordance with paragraph (2).(2) In appointing the membership of the committee, the secretary shall ensure geographic and demographic diversity in membership, including individuals representing rural and urban areas of this Commonwealth. The secretary shall ensure that the composition of the committee includes the following:(i) Three individuals representing boards of school directors.(ii) Two early childhood education teachers.(iii) Two individuals who have expertise in early childhood development.(iv) One individual representing charter schools.(v) Two individuals representing special education.(vi) Three individuals, including at least two from academia, who by reason of employment or profession, have proven expertise in early childhood education and one who shall have expertise in English as a second language.(vii) Two individuals representing the business community.20250HB0829PN0860 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (viii) Two parents or guardians.(c) Legislative appointments.--(1) The Majority Leader of the Senate and the Minority Leader of the Senate shall each appoint one Senator to serve as a nonvoting member of the committee.(2) The Majority Leader of the House of Representatives and the Minority Leader of the House of Representatives shall each appoint one representative to serve as a nonvoting member of the committee.(3) Legislative appointees shall be nonvoting members of the committee and shall serve in an advisory capacity only.(d) Chairperson.--The secretary shall serve as chairperson of the committee and may appoint a designee to serve as acting chairperson in the secretary's absence.(e) Quorum, voting and meetings of committee.--(1) A majority of the public members of the committee shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business.(2) Official action by the committee shall require the approval of a majority of the voting members of the committee.(3) When a vacancy occurs in public membership for any cause, the secretary shall make an appointment to fill the vacancy to become effective immediately.(4) The committee shall meet at times and places specified by the call of the chair.(5) The committee may adopt rules as the committee determines necessary and appropriate for the work and operation of the committee.(f) Compensation.--(1) Members of the committee appointed in accordance 20250HB0829PN0860 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 with subsection (b) shall not be entitled to compensation or reimbursement for expenses and shall serve as volunteers on the committee except that public members may be reimbursed for expenses incurred in the official discharge of duties as members of the committee in accordance with Commonwealth policy governing executive agencies under the jurisdiction of the Governor.(2) Legislative appointees of the committee shall not be entitled to a per diem for service on the committee. Reimbursement for mileage expenses or any other expense incurred due to the work of the committee shall be at the discretion of the legislative appointees' appointing authority.(g) Cooperation required.--All agencies of State government and all school entities shall assist the committee in the performance of the committee's duties and shall, to the extent permitted by laws relating to confidentiality, furnish assistance, advice and information as the members of the committee consider necessary to perform the committee's duties.(h) Duty to provide resources.--In addition to the requirements of section 1524-D, the committee shall provide school entities with resources, including technical expertise related to capital needs, enrollment trends, funding requirements, best practices for providing full-day kindergarten and other information a school entity may require to determine the following:(1) whether a school district should implement a full-day kindergarten or contract with an approved provider;(2) whether a full-day kindergarten should be implemented jointly with another school district in the same 20250HB0829PN0860 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 intermediate unit; and(3) how to implement a full-day kindergarten.Section 1524-D. Duties of committee and development of State plan.(a) Development of plan.--The committee shall assist the department with the development of a plan to facilitate the implementation of a full-day kindergarten by the board of school directors in each school district in this Commonwealth.(b) Content of plan.--The plan shall include, but not be limited to, the following:(1) A description of the full-day kindergarten that will be developed and implemented and how it will:(i) support students' cognitive, social, emotional and physical development; and(ii) ensure school readiness.(2) A statement of the goals for the full-day kindergarten and how the goals will be measured through program outcomes and other means.(3) A description of how the department will involve representatives of approved providers that administer early learning programs addressing children between three and five years of age.(4) A description of how the department will coordinate with existing federally funded programs, including the Head Start program, State-funded prekindergarten, including the Pre-K Counts Program as defined under section 1511-D, public school programs and child care providers.(5) A plan that would allow a school district or several school districts in the same intermediate unit to partner with philanthropic investors and private sector investors to 20250HB0829PN0860 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 develop and implement strategies designed to secure private sector capital to fund full-day kindergarten.(6) A comprehensive financial analysis of:(i) specific State taxes imposed under the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971;(ii) the rate at which taxes under subparagraph (i) could be increased; and(iii) an estimate of the revenue that could be generated to fund full-day kindergarten.(7) A plan to address the shortages of qualified early childhood education teachers, including how to increase compensation to that comparable to public school teachers.(8) How the department will provide ongoing professional development opportunities to help increase the number of teachers in early childhood education programs who meet the State's education or credential requirements for kindergarten teachers.(9) A plan to address how the programs will meet the needs of children with disabilities, limited English proficiency and other special needs.(10) A plan to provide transportation for children to and from the programs.(11) A plan to ensure that parents and guardians of children enrolled in the program are actively involved with and engaged in the child's education.(c) Report and proposed legislation.--The committee shall:(1) Submit a comprehensive report of the committee's findings to the department.(2) Submit proposed legislation containing the 20250HB0829PN0860 - 13 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 committee's statutory recommendation for full-day kindergarten to the department, the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Education Committee of the Senate and the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Education Committee of the House of Representatives no later than January 1, 2026 . (d) Content of report.--The report and proposed legislation under subsection (c) shall:(1) Establish a method for providing funding for full-day kindergarten to school districts.(2) Include options for implementation of full-day kindergarten.(3) Consider the feasibility of developing and implementing pilot programs in geographically diverse school districts in this Commonwealth.(4) Consider options for phasing in funding described in paragraph (1).(5) Not consider any other issues or proposed legislation that is not directly and specifically related to the establishment and implementation of full-day kindergarten.Section 1525-D. Local requirements.(a) Duties of school districts.--A school district shall provide kindergarten facilities free of charge for eligible students residing in the school district by operating the facilities either singly or jointly with other school districts in the same intermediate unit or by contracting with an approved provider in accordance with regulations of the State Board of Education.(b) General requirements and approved providers.--An 20250HB0829PN0860 - 14 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 approved provider receiving funding under this subarticle shall:(1) Maintain a maximum class size of no more than 18 children.(2) Maintain a ratio of no more than 10 children for each member of the teaching staff.(3) Ensure that all kindergarten teachers meet State certification requirements in accordance with the requirements of this subarticle.(4) Meet all health and safety standards as required by the department.(c) Duties of certain approved providers.--An approved provider that is not a school entity under this subarticle shall submit an application to the department. The application shall contain all of the following:(1) A description of the full-day kindergarten to be provided.(2) A statement demonstrating the need for a program or an enhanced or expanded program in the area served by the approved provider.(3) A description of the age-appropriate educational curriculum and student outcomes and developmentally appropriate educational curriculum and student outcomes.(4) A description of how the approved provider will collaborate with existing community-based child care providers, school entities, Head Start programs and other providers of early learning programs, as appropriate.(5) A description of how students and families will be assisted in obtaining any needed social and human services.(6) A plan to promote and achieve parental and guardian involvement in the program.20250HB0829PN0860 - 15 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (7) A description of how teachers will receive ongoing professional development in early childhood development and early childhood education.(8) Any other information the department may require.Section 1526-D. Professional development.(a) Availability of funding.--The department may provide a portion of any funds made available under this subarticle for ongoing professional development activities for kindergarten teachers.(b) Use of funds.--Any funds that may be made available to approved providers under this section shall be used for ongoing professional development to accomplish the following:(1) Provide kindergarten teachers and staff with the knowledge and skills for the application of recent research on child cognitive, social, emotional and physical development, including, but not limited to, language and literacy development and early childhood pedagogy.(2) Work with children enrolled in full-day kindergarten who have limited English proficiency, disabilities and other special needs.(3) Select and use developmentally appropriate screening and diagnostic assessments to improve teaching and learning and make appropriate referrals for services to support the development and learning of children in full-day kindergarten.(4) Provide the cost of education needed to obtain a credential or degree with specific training in early childhood development or education, if approved through regulation of the department.Section 5. The amendment of sections 503 and 1301, the 20250HB0829PN0860 - 16 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 definition of "compulsory school age" in section 1326 and section 1361 of the act shall apply beginning with the 2026-2027 school year.Section 6. This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB0829PN0860 - 17 - 1234